District of Columbia statutes.
2-361.05

Acquisition planning.

(a)

The CPO shall develop and implement a process by which each agency subject to the CPO’s procurement authority shall prepare and submit to the CPO an acquisition plan identifying the size and nature of the anticipated procurement workload for the following fiscal year.

(b)

Each agency shall submit its acquisition plan for the following fiscal year to the Council no later than March 20 of each year.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1105, 58 DCR 1185